Hawaii statutes.
§146-23 Duty of vendor of butchered beef to
disclose identity of person from whom obtained. It shall be the duty of
every vendor of butchered beef to know and truthfully state to any inquirer the
name and residence of the person from whom the vendor obtained the beef which
the vendor has for sale. [L 1923, c 7, §2; RL 1925, §4189; RL 1935, §5981; RL
1945, §11381; RL 1955, §290-3; HRS §146-23; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next